Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-805.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-551.01; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-806.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of § 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-551.02; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-807.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

64.2-807

, pertaining to severability, derived from 2005, c. 935, § 55-551.03; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-808.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

This chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2006;

This chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2006;

This chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2006, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2006, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2006, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2006, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-551.06; 2012, c. 614.